Utah statutes.
16-17-401.   Jurisdiction and venue.
The appointment or maintenance in this state of a registered agent does not by
itself create the basis for personal jurisdiction over the represented entity
in this state.  The address of the agent does not determine venue in an action
or proceeding involving the entity.
